Indiana, session 2026, SB19.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 3-5-2.1-15, AS ADDED BY P.L.186-2025,
SECTION 6, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 15. "Candidacy document" refers to any of the
following:
(1) A declaration of intent to be a write-in candidate.
(2) A declaration of candidacy.
(3) A consent to the nomination.
(4) A consent to become a candidate.
(5) A certificate of candidate selection.
(6) A consent filed under IC 3-13-2-7.
(7) A statement filed under IC 33-24-2, IC 33-25-2,
IC 33-33-45-42, IC 33-33-49-13.3, or IC 33-33-71-43.
SECTION 2. IC 3-8-7-16, AS AMENDED BY P.L.193-2021,
SECTION 18, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 16. (a) This section does not apply to the
certification of nominees under IC 3-10-4-5.
(b) The election division shall certify the following to each county
2026 IN 19—LS 6119/DI 149


election board not later than noon seventy-four (74) days before a
general election:
(1) The name and place of residence of each person nominated for
election to:
(A) an office for which the electorate of the whole state may
vote;
(B) the United States House of Representatives;
(C) a legislative office; or
(D) a local office for which a declaration of candidacy must be
filed with the election division under IC 3-8-2.
(2) The name of each:
(A) justice of the supreme court;
(B) judge of the court of appeals;
(C) judge of the tax court; and
(D) judge of a circuit or superior court;
who is subject to a retention vote by the electorate and who has
filed a statement under IC 33-24-2, IC 33-25-2, IC 33-33-45,
IC 33-33-49, or IC 33-33-71 indicating that the justice or judge
wishes to have the question of the justice's or judge's retention
placed on the ballot.
(c) Subject to compliance with section 11 of this chapter, the
election division shall designate the device under which the list of
candidates of each political party will be printed and the order in which
the political party ticket will be arranged under IC 3-10-4-2 and
IC 3-11-2-6.
SECTION 3. IC 3-13-6-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.278-2019,
SECTION 156, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. (a) As used in this section,
"judge" refers to a judge of a circuit, superior, or probate court.
(b) If a judge wants to resign from office, the judge must resign as
provided in IC 5-8-3.5.
(c) A vacancy that occurs because of the death of a judge may be
certified to the governor under IC 5-8-6.
(d) A vacancy that occurs, other than by resignation or death of a
judge, shall be certified to the governor by the circuit court clerk of the
county in which the judge resided.
(e) A vacancy in the office of judge of a circuit court shall be filled
by the governor as provided by Article 5, Section 18 of the Constitution
of the State of Indiana. However, the governor may not fill a vacancy
that occurs because of the death of a judge until the governor receives
notice of the death under IC 5-8-6.
(f) The person who is appointed holds the office until:
2026 IN 19—LS 6119/DI 149


(1) the end of the unexpired term; or
(2) a successor is elected at the next general election for the
office, and qualified;
whichever occurs first.
(g) Except in a year in which the office is scheduled to be placed on
the ballot, and except as provided in this subsection, the office of judge
of the circuit court shall be elected at the next general election
following the date any vacancy occurred. If a vacancy occurs in the
office of judge of the circuit court after noon seventy-four (74) days
before a general election, the office shall be elected at the second
general election following the date any vacancy occurred.
(h) The person elected at the general election following an
appointment to fill the vacancy, upon being qualified, holds office for
the six (6) year term prescribed by Article 7, Section 7 of the
Constitution of the State of Indiana and until a successor is elected and
qualified.
(i) A vacancy in the office of judge of a superior or probate court
shall be filled by the governor subject to the following:
(1) IC 33-33-2-39.
(2) IC 33-33-2-43.
(3) IC 33-33-45-38.
(4) (3) IC 33-33-71-40.
(5) (4) IC 33-33-49-13.4.
However, the governor may not fill a vacancy that occurs because of
the death of a judge until the governor receives notice of the death
under IC 5-8-6. The person who is appointed holds office for the
remainder of the unexpired term.
SECTION 4. IC 5-8-1-19, AS AMENDED BY P.L.201-2011,
SECTION 7, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 19. (a) Under Article 7, Section 13 of the
Constitution of the State of Indiana, whenever a circuit, superior, or
probate court judge or prosecuting attorney has been convicted of
corruption or any other high crime, the attorney general shall bring
proceedings in the supreme court, on information, in the name of the
state, for the removal from office of the judge or prosecuting attorney.
(b) If the judgment is against the defendant, the defendant is
removed from office. The governor, the officer, or the entity required
to fill a vacancy under IC 3-13-6-2 shall, subject to:
(1) IC 33-33-2-39;
(2) IC 33-33-2-43; and
(3) IC 33-33-45-38; and
(4) (3) IC 33-33-71-40;
2026 IN 19—LS 6119/DI 149


appoint or select a successor to fill the vacancy in office.
SECTION 5. IC 33-23-1-7 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 7. "Judicial nominating
commission", except as used in IC 33-33-2 IC 33-33-45, and
IC 33-33-71, means the commission described in Article 7, Section 9
of the Constitution of the State of Indiana.
SECTION 6. IC 33-29-1.9 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]:
Chapter 1.9. Transition to Election of Judges
Sec. 1. (a) As used in this section, "judge" refers to an individual
who holds the office of judge of the Lake County superior court on
June 30, 2026.
(b) Notwithstanding the amendment and repeal of provisions in
IC 33-33-45 relating to the election of Lake County superior court
judges by legislation enacted during the 2026 session of the general
assembly, the term of a judge does not terminate until the date that
the term of the judge would have terminated under IC 33-33-45, as
in effect on June 30, 2026.
(c) The first election under IC 33-33-45, required by the statute
in effect on July 1, 2026, to fill the position of a judge sitting on the
Lake County superior court on June 30, 2026, occurs at the general
election immediately preceding the date on which the term of that
judge would have terminated under the version of IC 33-33-45 in
effect on June 30, 2026.
Sec. 2. This chapter expires July 1, 2033.
SECTION 7. IC 33-33-45-3 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3. (a) There is
established a superior court in Lake County (referred to as "the court"
in this chapter).
(b) The court consists of the following:
(1) Sixteen (16) judges, each of whom shall be elected at a
general election every six (6) years in Lake County.
(2) The Lake County circuit court judge, if the circuit court
judge chooses to sit on the Lake County superior court.
(c) The term of a judge described in subsection (b)(1) begins
January 1 following the judge's election and extends through
December 31 following the election of the judge's successor.
(d) To be eligible to hold office as a judge of the court, an
individual must be:
(1) a resident of Lake County; and
(2) admitted to the practice of law in Indiana.
2026 IN 19—LS 6119/DI 149


(e) A candidate for judge shall be nominated as candidates for
judge of other superior courts are nominated under IC 3-8.
SECTION 8. IC 33-33-45-21, AS AMENDED BY P.L.201-2011,
SECTION 60, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 21. (a) The court is divided into civil (including
probate), criminal, county, and juvenile divisions. The work of the
court shall be divided among the divisions by the rules of the court.
(b) Seven (7) judges comprise the civil division. Four (4) judges
comprise the criminal division. Four (4) judges comprise the county
division. One (1) judge comprises the juvenile division. However, the
court by rule may alter the number of judges assigned to a division of
the court if the court determines that the change is necessary for the
efficient operation of the court.
(c) The court by rule may reassign a judge of the court from one (1)
division to another if the court determines that the change is necessary
for the efficient operation of the court. The court by rule may establish
a rotation schedule providing for the rotation of judges through the
various divisions. The rotation schedule may be used if the court
determines that an emergency exists. However, a senior judge of any
division may not be reassigned or rotated to another division under this
subsection.
(d) The chief judge of the court may assign a judge in one (1)
division of the court to hear a case originating in another division of the
court, and may reassign cases from one (1) judge to another, if the chief
judge determines that the change is necessary for the efficient operation
of the court.
(e) A judge of a division of the court who has not been appointed to
the court under section 38 of this chapter is not eligible to be
reassigned, rotated, or transferred to the other divisions of the court.
However, a judge of a division of the court who has not been appointed
to the court under section 38 of this chapter may apply to fill a vacancy
in another division of the court through appointment as provided under
this chapter.
SECTION 9. IC 33-33-45-25 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]. Sec. 25. (a) At the general election immediately preceding the
expiration of a judge's extended term, the question of that judge's
retention in office or rejection shall be submitted to the electorate of
Lake County under section 42 of this chapter. Thereafter, unless
rejected by the electorate, each judge shall serve successive terms as
provided in section 41(b) of this chapter.
(b) A judge of the county division serving on June 30, 2011, is
subject to the question of the judge's retention in office or rejection as
2026 IN 19—LS 6119/DI 149


provided in subsection (a) at the expiration of the judge's term of office
under the law in effect on June 30, 2011.
SECTION 10. IC 33-33-45-26 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]. Sec. 26. The superior court of Lake County consists of sixteen
(16) judges plus the Lake circuit court judge if the circuit court judge
chooses to sit on the superior court of Lake County.
SECTION 11. IC 33-33-45-27 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]. Sec. 27. (a) There is established a judicial nominating
commission for the superior court of Lake County, the functions,
responsibilities, and procedures of which are set forth in sections 28
through 37 of this chapter.
(b) The board of county commissioners of Lake County shall
provide all facilities, equipment, supplies, and services as may be
necessary for the administration of the duties imposed upon the
commission. The members of the commission shall serve without
compensation. However, the board of county commissioners of Lake
County shall reimburse members of the commission for actual
expenses incurred in performing their duties.
SECTION 12. IC 33-33-45-28 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]. Sec. 28. (a) The judicial nominating commission (referred to
in this chapter as the commission) consists of seven (7) voting
members, the majority of whom form a quorum. The chief justice of
Indiana or the chief justice's designee serves ex officio as a voting
member only to resolve tie votes and as the chairperson of the
commission.
(b) The:
(1) governor shall appoint three (3) members to the commission:
(A) one (1) of whom must be an attorney;
(B) one (1) of whom must be a nonattorney who has never
been licensed to practice law; and
(C) one (1) of whom must be a woman; and
(2) Lake County board of commissioners shall appoint three (3)
members to the commission:
(A) one (1) of whom must be an attorney;
(B) one (1) of whom must be a nonattorney who has never
been licensed to practice law; and
(C) one (1) of whom must be an individual from a minority
group (as defined in IC 5-28-20-5).
The appointees must reside in Lake County, have no prior felony
conviction, and reflect the composition of the community. If the Lake
County board of commissioners fails to appoint any commission
members within the time required to do so in section 29 of this chapter,
2026 IN 19—LS 6119/DI 149


the appointment shall be made by the chairperson of the commission.
The chairperson of the commission shall have standing to dispute the
validity of an appointed member.
(c) A member of the commission, other than a judge or justice, may
not hold any other elected public office. A member may not hold an
office in a political party or organization.
(d) A member of the commission is not eligible for appointment to
a judicial office in Lake County if the member is a member of the
commission and for three (3) years thereafter.
(e) Except for the chief justice of Indiana or the chief justice's
designee, if any voting member of the commission terminates the
member's residence in Lake County, the member is considered to have
resigned from the commission.
SECTION 13. IC 33-33-45-29 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]. Sec. 29. (a) The Lake County board of commissioners shall
appoint three (3) members of the commission.
(b) One (1) month before the expiration of a term of office of a
commissioner appointed by the Lake County board of commissioners,
an appointment or reappointment shall be made in accordance with
section 28 of this chapter. All appointments made by the Lake County
board of commissioners shall be certified to the secretary of state, the
clerk of the supreme court, and the clerk of Lake circuit court within
ten (10) days after the appointment.
(c) Each member appointed by the Lake County board of
commissioners shall be appointed for a term of four (4) years.
(d) Whenever a vacancy occurs in the office of a commissioner
appointed by the Lake County board of commissioners, the chairperson
of the commission shall promptly notify the Lake County board of
commissioners in writing of such fact. Vacancies in the office of
commissioners appointed by the Lake County board of commissioners
shall be filled by appointment of the Lake County board of
commissioners within sixty (60) days after notice of the vacancy is
received. The term of the commissioner appointed by the Lake County
board of commissioners is for the unexpired term of the member whose
vacancy the new member has filled.
SECTION 14. IC 33-33-45-32 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]. Sec. 32. After the voting members of the commission have
been appointed by the governor and the voting members of the
commission appointed by the Lake County board of commissioners
have been certified to the secretary of state, clerk of the supreme court,
and clerk of the Lake circuit court as this chapter provides, the clerk of
the Lake circuit court shall by regular mail notify the members of the
2026 IN 19—LS 6119/DI 149


commission of their election or appointment and shall notify the
chairperson of the judicial nominating commission of the same.
SECTION 15. IC 33-33-45-33 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]. Sec. 33. A member of the judicial nominating commission
may serve until the member's successor is appointed. A voting member
of the commission is not eligible for more than two (2) successive
reappointments.
SECTION 16. IC 33-33-45-34 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]. Sec. 34. (a) When a vacancy occurs in the superior court of
Lake County, the clerk of the court shall promptly notify the
chairperson and each member of the commission of the vacancy. The
chairperson shall call a meeting of the commission within ten (10) days
following the notice. The commission shall submit its nominations of
five (5) candidates for each vacancy and certify them to the governor
as promptly as possible, and not later than sixty (60) days after the
vacancy occurs. When it is known that a vacancy will occur at a
definite future date within the term of the governor then serving, but
the vacancy has not yet occurred, the clerk shall notify the chairperson
and each member of the commission immediately of the forthcoming
vacancy, and the commission may within fifty (50) days of the notice
of the vacancy make its nominations and submit to the governor the
names of five (5) persons nominated for the forthcoming vacancy.
(b) Meetings of the commission shall be called by its chairperson or,
if the chairperson fails to call a necessary meeting, upon the call of any
four (4) members of the commission. The chairperson, whenever the
chairperson considers a meeting necessary, or upon the request by any
four (4) members of the commission for a meeting, shall give each
member of the commission at least five (5) days written notice by mail
of the date, time, and place of every meeting unless the commission at
its previous meeting designated the date, time, and place of its next
meeting.
(c) Meetings of the commission are to be held at the Lake County
government center in Crown Point or another place, as the circuit court
clerk of Lake County may arrange, at the direction of the chairperson
of the commission.
(d) The commission may act only at a public meeting. IC 5-14-1.5
applies to meetings of the commission. The commission may not meet
in executive session under IC 5-14-1.5-6.1 for the consideration of a
candidate for judicial appointment.
(e) The commission may act only by the concurrence of a majority
of its voting members attending a meeting. Four (4) voting members
constitute a quorum at a meeting.
2026 IN 19—LS 6119/DI 149


(f) The commission may adopt reasonable and proper rules and
regulations for the conduct of its proceedings and the discharge of its
duties. These rules must provide for the receipt of public testimony
concerning the qualifications of candidates for nomination to the
governor.
SECTION 17. IC 33-33-45-35 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]. Sec. 35. In selecting the five (5) nominees to be submitted to
the governor, the commission shall comply with the following
requirements:
(1) The commission shall submit only the names of the five (5)
most highly qualified candidates from among all those eligible
individuals considered. To be eligible for nomination as a judge
of the superior court of Lake County, a person must be domiciled
in the county of Lake, a citizen of the United States, and admitted
to the practice of law in Indiana.
(2) In abiding by the mandate in subdivision (1), the commission
shall evaluate in writing each eligible individual on the following
factors:
(A) Law school record, including any academic honors and
achievements.
(B) Contribution to scholarly journals and publications,
legislative drafting, and legal briefs.
(C) Activities in public service, including:
(i) writings and speeches concerning public or civic affairs
that are on public record, including but not limited to
campaign speeches or writings, letters to newspapers, and
testimony before public agencies;
(ii) government service;
(iii) efforts and achievements in improving the
administration of justice; and
(iv) other conduct relating to the individual's profession.
(D) Legal experience, including the number of years of
practicing law, the kind of practice involved, and reputation as
a trial lawyer or judge.
(E) Probable judicial temperament.
(F) Physical condition, including age, stamina, and possible
habitual intemperance.
(G) Personality traits, including the exercise of sound
judgment, ability to compromise and conciliate, patience,
decisiveness, and dedication.
(H) Membership on boards of directors, financial interests, and
any other consideration that might create conflict of interest
2026 IN 19—LS 6119/DI 149


with a judicial office.
(I) Any other pertinent information that the commission feels
is important in selecting the best qualified individuals for
judicial office.
(3) These written evaluations shall not be made on an individual
until the individual states in writing that the individual desires to
hold a judicial office that is or will be created by vacancy.
(4) The political affiliations of any candidate may not be
considered by the commission in evaluating and determining
which eligible candidates shall be recommended to the governor
for a vacancy on the superior court of Lake County.
(5) In determining which eligible candidates are recommended to
the governor, the commission shall consider that racial and gender
diversity enhances the quality of the judiciary.
SECTION 18. IC 33-33-45-36 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]. Sec. 36. (a) The commission shall submit with the list of five
(5) nominees to the governor its written evaluation of the qualifications
of each candidate.
(b) The names of the nominees and the written evaluations are
public records that may be inspected and copied under IC 5-14-3.
(c) Every eligible candidate whose name was not submitted to the
governor shall have access to any evaluation on the candidate by the
commission and the right to make such evaluation public.
(d) Records specifically prepared for discussion or developed during
discussion in an executive session under IC 5-14-1.5-6.1 are excepted
from public disclosure, unless the records are prepared for use in the
consideration of a candidate for judicial appointment.
SECTION 19. IC 33-33-45-37 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]. Sec. 37. (a) After the commission has nominated and
submitted to the governor the names of five (5) persons for
appointment to fill a vacancy of the superior court of Lake County:
(1) any name may be withdrawn for cause considered by the
commission to be of a substantial nature affecting the nominee's
qualifications to hold office; and
(2) another name may be substituted;
before the appointment is made to fill the vacancy.
(b) If a nominee dies or requests in writing that the nominee's name
be withdrawn, the commission shall nominate another person to replace
the nominee.
(c) If two (2) or more vacancies exist, the commission shall
nominate and submit to the governor a list of five (5) different persons
for each of the vacancies. The commission may, before an appointment
2026 IN 19—LS 6119/DI 149


is made, withdraw the lists of nominations, change the names of any
persons nominated from one (1) list to another, and resubmit them as
changed, or may substitute a new name for any of those previously
nominated.
SECTION 20. IC 33-33-45-38 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]. Sec. 38. (a) A vacancy occurring on the court shall be filled
by appointment of the governor from a list of five (5) nominees
presented to the governor by the judicial nominating commission. If the
governor fails to make an appointment from the list within sixty (60)
days after the day it is presented to the governor, the appointment shall
be made by the chief justice or the acting chief justice of Indiana from
the same list, or altered list as provided for in section 37 of this chapter.
(b) The governor shall make all appointments to the court without
regard to the political affiliation of any of the five (5) nominees
submitted to the governor. In the interest of justice, the governor shall
consider only those qualifications of the nominees included in section
35 of this chapter.
SECTION 21. IC 33-33-45-40 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]. Sec. 40. An appointment by the governor or chief justice, as
required by section 38 of this chapter, to the superior court of Lake
County takes effect immediately if a vacancy exists at the date of the
appointment. The appointment takes effect on the date the vacancy is
created if a vacancy does not exist at the date of appointment.
SECTION 22. IC 33-33-45-41 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]. Sec. 41. (a) Each judge appointed under section 38 of this
chapter serves an initial term, which begins on the effective date of the
appointment of the judge and continues through December 31 in the
year of the general election that follows the expiration of two (2) years
after the effective date of the judge's appointment.
(b) Unless the judge:
(1) is rejected by the electorate of Lake County; or
(2) does not file the statement required;
under section 42 of this chapter, a judge of the superior court shall
serve successive six (6) year terms.
(c) Each six (6) year term begins on the first day of January
following the expiration of the preceding initial term or the preceding
six (6) year term, as the case may be, and continues for six (6) years.
SECTION 23. IC 33-33-45-42 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]. Sec. 42. (a) The question of the retention in office or rejection
of each judge of the superior court of Lake County shall be submitted
to the electorate of Lake County at the general election immediately
preceding expiration of the term of the judge.
2026 IN 19—LS 6119/DI 149


(b) At the general election, the question of the retention in office or
rejection of a judge described in subsection (a) shall be submitted to
the electorate of Lake County in the form prescribed by IC 3-11 and
must state "Shall Judge (insert name) of the superior court of Lake
County be retained in office for an additional term?".
(c) If a majority of the ballots cast by the electors voting on any
question is "Yes", the judge whose name appeared on the question shall
be approved for a six (6) year term beginning January 1 following the
general election as provided in section 41(b) of this chapter.
(d) If a majority of the ballots cast by the electors voting on any
question is "No", the judge whose name appeared on the question shall
be rejected. The office of the rejected judge is vacant on January 1
following the rejection. The vacancy shall be filled by appointment by
the governor under section 38 of this chapter.
(e) The Lake County election board shall submit the question of the
retention in office or rejection of a judge described in subsection (a) to
the electorate of Lake County. The submission of the question is
subject to the provisions of IC 3 that are not inconsistent with this
chapter.
(f) A judge who wishes to be retained in office shall file a statement
with the secretary of state, not later than noon July 15 of the year in
which the question of retention of the judge is to be placed on the
general election ballot, indicating that the judge wishes to have the
question of the judge's retention placed on the ballot. The judge's
statement must include a statement of the judge's name as:
(1) the judge wants the judge's name to appear on the ballot; and
(2) the candidate's name is permitted to appear on the ballot under
IC 3-5-7.
(g) If a judge does not file the statement required under subsection
(f), the question of that judge's retention in office or rejection shall not
be submitted to the electorate, and the office becomes vacant at the
expiration of the term.
SECTION 24. IC 33-33-45-44 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]. Sec. 44. (a) A judge of the superior court may not during a
term of office as judge of the superior court do any of the following:
(1) Engage in the practice of law.
(2) Run for elective office.
(3) Take part in any political campaign.
(b) Failure to comply with this section is sufficient cause for the
commission on judicial qualifications to recommend to the supreme
court that the judge be censured or removed.
(c) A political party may not directly or indirectly campaign for or
2026 IN 19—LS 6119/DI 149


against a judge subject to retention or rejection under this chapter.
2026 IN 19—LS 6119/DI 149